Maine, session 132, LD313.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §601, sub-§2, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. Each ballot must include a unique identifier.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §603, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 455, §20, is
further amended to read:
A. The words "SAMPLE BALLOT" in bold type, the title and date of the election, and
the name of the voting district must be printed at the top of the ballot. The facsimile
of the state seal may not be printed on it. A unique identifier may not be printed on it.
It must be printed flat. Otherwise, it must be printed substantially the same as a regular
ballot.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §607, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
3. Municipality may provide. A municipality may provide ballot boxes at its own
expense. Each box may contain a mechanical device for counting and endorsing the ballots
deposited in it but it may not be equipped to record any distinguishing mark or number on
a ballot, except for the unique identifier printed on each ballot. Each box must meet the
requirements of this section. Once approved by the Secretary of State, each box becomes
an official ballot box.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §809-B is enacted to read:
§809-B. Voting device to record votes by unique identifier
1. Record votes by unique identifier. A voting device used in the conduct of state
elections must be able to record the unique identifier assigned to each ballot and any votes
cast for any person, or on any question, on that ballot. It must record this information in a
way that prevents any association between the identity of the voter and the ballot.
2. Public list. As soon as practicable after an election return is prepared under section
711, the clerk shall make public on the municipality's publicly accessible website a list of
votes for each ballot cast using a voting device in that municipality, organized by unique
identifier. This subsection does not apply to paper ballots counted using other methods.
Nothing in this section authorizes public disclosure of an official ballot, which is not a
public record pursuant to section 22.